Massachusetts, session 194th, H4161.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Massachusetts
Department of Transportation shall establish a sick leave bank for Mark Kratman, an employee
of the Massachusetts Department of Transportation. Any employee of the Massachusetts
Department of Transportation may voluntarily contribute 1 or more sick, personal, or vacation
days to the sick leave bank for use by Mark Kratman. If Mark Kratman terminates employment
with the Massachusetts Department of Transportation or requests to dissolve the sick leave bank,
any remaining time in the sick leave bank shall be transferred to the Massachusetts Department
of Transportation paid leave bank. Sick leave bank days shall not be used for absences unrelated
to the illness or disability that necessitated the establishment of the sick leave bank as determined
by the Massachusetts Department of Transportation.
of 1